Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.900

References to director and department.

All references to the director or department of community, trade, and economic development in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the director of commerce or the department of commerce.

[ 2009 c 565 s 17; 1993 c 280 s 79.]